apertium-id-ms.id.metadix
    <pardef n="diperikut/__vblex">
    <e c="diper-, diper-kan">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dipergaul/kan__vblex">
    <e c="diper-kan, diper-i">
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dipersalin/__vblex">
    <e c="diper-, diper-kan, diper-i">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- diper- (N -> V) -->
    <pardef n="diperadik/__n">
    <e c="memper">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperanak/kan__n">
    <e c="diper-kan">
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dipersenjata/i__n">
    <e c="diper-i">
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dipersiang/__n">
    <e c="diper-, diper-i">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperdaya/__n">
    <e c="diper-, diper-kan">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperkebun/kan__n">
    <e c="diper-kan, diper-i">
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperalat/__n">
    <e c="diper-, diper-kan, diper-i">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- diper- (Adj -> V) -->
    <pardef n="diperaman/__adj">
    <e c="memper">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dipergembira/kan__adj">
    <e c="diper-kan">
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperbaik/i__adj">
    <e c="diper-i">
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperbanyak/__adj">
    <e c="diper-, diper-kan">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="baik__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- se- -->
    <pardef n="sekelas__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="attr"/><s n="se"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sebaik__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="se"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- ter- -->
    <pardef n="terbaik__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ter"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="ingin__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>   
    
    <pardef n="dan__cnjcoo">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e lm="ikut"><p><l>diperikut</l><r>ikut</r></p><par n="diperikut/__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tetap"><p><l>dipertetap</l><r>tetap</r></p><par n="diperikut/__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gaul"><p><l>dipergaul</l><r>gaul</r></p><par n="dipergaul/kan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ingat"><p><l>diperingat</l><r>ingat</r></p><par n="dipergaul/kan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="salin"><p><l>dipersalin</l><r>salin</r></p><par n="dipersalin/__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="budak"><p><l>diperbudak</l><r>budak</r></p><par n="diperadik/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kacang"><p><l>diperkacang</l><r>kacang</r></p><par n="diperadik/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tangis"><p><l>dipertangis</l><r>tangis</r></p><par n="diperadik/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="contoh"><p><l>dipercontoh</l><r>contoh</r></p><par n="diperanak/kan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="judi"><p><l>diperjudi</l><r>judi</r></p><par n="diperanak/kan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sewa"><p><l>dipersewa</l><r>sewa</r></p><par n="diperanak/kan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="antara"><p><l>diperantara</l><r>antara</r></p><par n="dipersenjata/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="senjata"><p><l>dipersenjata</l><r>senjata</r></p><par n="dipersenjata/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="siang"><p><l>dipersiang</l><r>siang</r></p><par n="dipersiang/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gundik"><p><l>dipergundik</l><r>gundik</r></p><par n="diperdaya/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="laki"><p><l>diperlaki</l><r>laki</r></p><par n="diperdaya/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="setan"><p><l>dipersetan</l><r>setan</r></p><par n="diperdaya/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kebun"><p><l>diperkebun</l><r>kebun</r></p><par n="diperkebun/kan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pukul"><p><l>diperpukul</l><r>pukul</r></p><par n="diperkebun/kan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="selang"><p><l>diperselang</l><r>selang</r></p><par n="diperkebun/kan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alat"><p><l>diperalat</l><r>alat</r></p><par n="diperalat/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ladang"><p><l>diperladang</l><r>ladang</r></p><par n="diperalat/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gundah"><p><l>dipergundah</l><r>gundah</r></p><par n="diperaman/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lebar"><p><l>diperlebar</l><r>lebar</r></p><par n="diperaman/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="renggang"><p><l>diperrenggang</l><r>renggang</r></p><par n="diperaman/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lemah"><p><l>diperlemah</l><r>lemah</r></p><par n="dipergembira/kan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ringan"><p><l>diperringan</l><r>ringan</r></p><par n="dipergembira/kan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tahan"><p><l>dipertahan</l><r>tahan</r></p><par n="dipergembira/kan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="baru"><p><l>diperbaru</l><r>baru</r></p><par n="diperbaik/i__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="carut"><p><l>dipercarut</l><r>carut</r></p><par n="diperbaik/i__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sakit"><p><l>dipersakit</l><r>sakit</r></p><par n="diperbaik/i__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dekat"><p><l>diperdekat</l><r>dekat</r></p><par n="diperbanyak/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="imbang"><p><l>diperimbang</l><r>imbang</r></p><par n="diperbanyak/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="teguh"><p><l>diperteguh</l><r>teguh</r></p><par n="diperbanyak/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hiperaktif"><i>hiperaktif</i><par n="baik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mudah"><i>mudah</i><par n="baik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="surati"><i>surati</i><par n="baik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hina"><p><l>sehina</l><r>hina</r></p><par n="sebaik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mujur"><p><l>semujur</l><r>mujur</r></p><par n="sebaik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dunia"><p><l>sedunia</l><r>dunia</r></p><par n="sekelas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="macam"><p><l>semacam</l><r>macam</r></p><par n="sekelas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pusat"><p><l>sepusat</l><r>pusat</r></p><par n="sekelas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="istimewa"><p><l>teristimewa</l><r>istimewa</r></p><par n="terbaik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="silam"><p><l>tersilam</l><r>silam</r></p><par n="terbaik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="langsung"><i>langsung</i><par n="ingin__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="selekas-lekasnya"><i>selekas-lekasnya</i><par n="ingin__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dan"><i>dan</i><par n="dan__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="lalu"><i>lalu</i><par n="dan__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="sementara"><i>sementara</i><par n="dan__cnjcoo"/></e>
